Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5854.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 51f. (1) In addition to the distributions under subsection (2) and sections 51 and 51d, 51e, from the revenue collected from the tax levied under section 51 an amount equal to that portion of the withholding tax capture revenues attributable to certified new jobs and due to be paid to an authorized business pursuant to a written agreement entered into under chapter 8D of the Michigan strategic fund act, 1984 PA 270, MCL 125.2090g to 125.2090j, shall must be deposited each state fiscal year into the good jobs for Michigan fund created in section 90j of the Michigan strategic fund act, 1984 PA 270, MCL 125.2090j. (2) As used in this section, subsection, "authorized business", "certified new jobs", "withholding tax capture revenues", and "written agreement" mean those terms as defined in section 90g of the Michigan strategic fund act, 1984 PA 270, MCL 125.2090g. (2) In addition to the distributions under subsection (1) and sections 51 and 51e, from the revenue collected from the tax levied under section 51, an amount equal to that portion of the withholding tax capture revenues attributable to employees that work within the HOPE zone and due to be paid to a qualified workforce development organization pursuant to a workforce development HOPE zone agreement entered into under article 4 of the helping opportunity prosper everywhere (HOPE) zone act must be deposited each state fiscal year into the workforce development HOPE zone fund created in section 45 of the helping opportunity prosper everywhere (HOPE) zone act. As used in this subsection: (a) "HOPE zone" means that term as defined under section 3 of the helping opportunity prosper everywhere (HOPE) zone act. (b) "Qualified workforce development organization" means that term as defined under section 5 of the helping opportunity prosper everywhere (HOPE) zone act. (c) "Withholding tax capture revenues" and "workforce development HOPE zone agreement" mean those terms as defined under section 7 of the helping opportunity prosper everywhere (HOPE) zone act. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S01123'25) or House Bill No. 5852 (request no. H01123'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.